Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-411
Legislative Council; message from Governor.

The Governor shall have the right to send a message to the session of the council convening next after the adjournment of each session of the Legislature, and may, from time to time, send additional messages containing his recommendations and explaining the policy of the administration.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 7, p. 423;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-507;

R.S.1943, § 50-411.